Utah statutes.
58-60-204.   License classifications.
The division shall issue licenses and certifications to individuals qualified
under this part in the classifications:
(1)  clinical social worker;
(2)  certified social worker;
(3)  certified social worker intern; and
(4)  social service worker.
